District of Columbia statutes.
31-1106

Records.

(a)

Every licensee shall maintain records of its premium finance transactions and the said records shall be open to examination and investigation by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may at any time require any licensee to bring such records as he may direct to the Commissioner’s office for examination.

(b)

Every licensee shall preserve its records of such premium finance transactions, including cards used in a card system, for at least 3 years after making the final entry in respect to any premium finance agreement. The preservation of records in photographic form shall constitute compliance with this requirement.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, ch. 792, ch. III, § 56
Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 126, Pub. L. 89-403, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(3), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1556.
1973 Ed., § 35-1366.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.